Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-425
Citation; issued, when; service.

Citations may also be issued under the following circumstances:

(1) In any case in which the prosecuting officer is convinced that a citation would serve all of the purposes of an arrest warrant; and

(2) Whenever any complaint or information is filed in any court in this state charging a felony, misdemeanor, infraction, or violation of a city or village ordinance when the court is convinced that a citation would serve all of the purposes of the arrest warrant procedure.

The citations provided for in this section may be served in the same manner as an arrest warrant, in the same manner as a summons in a civil action, or may be served by certified mail.

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 4;

Laws 1978, LB 808, § 8.